Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2902
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Employee Classification Act:

(1) Commissioner
means the Commissioner of Labor;

(2) Construction has the same meaning as
in section 48-2103;

(3) Contractor means an individual, partnership, limited liability
company, corporation, or other business entity engaged in a delivery service
or a construction contractor business, as contractor is defined in section
48-2103, and includes any subcontractor performing services for a contractor;

(4) Delivery
service means the transport and delivery of goods, products, supplies, or
raw materials upon the highways of this state;

(5) Department means the
Department of Labor; and

(6) Performing services means the performance of construction labor
or delivery services for remuneration.

Laws 2010, LB563, § 2.